Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299M.10, is amended to read: 299M.10 MONEY CREDITED TO GENERAL FUND. The fees and penalties collected under this chapterdeleted text begin , except as provided in section 299M.07,deleted text end must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the deleted text begin general fund. Money received by the State Fire Marshal Division in the form of gifts, grants, reimbursements, or appropriation from any source for the administration of this chapter must also be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund.deleted text end new text begin state fire marshal account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the state fire marshal account is annually appropriated to the commissioner of public safety to administer the programs under this chapter.new text end